src/morphology/stemparts/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_PARFAIT



0   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:’   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:’   N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:’   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:’     N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HEN    ;
0:’     N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:’     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:’     N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:’   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:’   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;

LEXICON N_BEIGNET



0   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:’   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:’   N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:’   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:’     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HEN    ;
0:’     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:’     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:’     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:’   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:’   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;

LEXICON N_VERSAILLES



0   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:’   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:’   N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:’   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:’     N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HIN    ;
0:’     N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:’     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:’     N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:0   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:’   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:’   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;

LEXICON N_SERGEJ



0   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:’   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:’   N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:’   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:’     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HIN    ;
0:’     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:’     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:’     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:0   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:’   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:’   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;

LEXICON N_BORDEAUX



0   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:’   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:’   N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:’   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:’     N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HON    ;
0:’     N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:’     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:’     N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:’   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:’   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;

LEXICON N_SHOW



0   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:’   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:’   N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:’   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:’     N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HUN    ;
0:’     N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:’     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:’     N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:’   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:’   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;

LEXICON N_CAMUS



0   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:’   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:’   N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:’   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:’     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HYN    ;
0:’     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:’     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:’     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:’   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:’   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;

LEXICON N_MONSIEUR



0   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:’   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:’   N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:’   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:’     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÖN    ;
0:’     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:’     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:’     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:’   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:’   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;









LEXICON N_TULI






0:i   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0 N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:e N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0 N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0 N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:i   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_SYLI






0:i   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0 N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:e N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0 N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0 N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:i   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_VUOHI




0:i   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0 N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:e N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:e N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0 N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0 N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:i   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_RUUHI





0:i   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0 N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:e N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0 N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0 N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:i   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_HIIRI




0:i   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0 N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:e N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0 N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0 N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:i   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;





LEXICON N_KAARI


0:i   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0 N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:e N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0 N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0 N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:i   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_MIELI

0:i   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0 N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:e N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0 N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0 N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:i   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;



LEXICON N_TAIMI




0:mi   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:me N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:m N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:n N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:me    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:me N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:m N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:m N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:n N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:m N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:mi   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:me   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:m   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_LIEMI



0:mi   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:me N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:m N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:n N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:me    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä ;
0:me N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:m N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:m N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:n N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:m N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:mi   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:me   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:m   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;






LEXICON N_KAUSI






0:si   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:te N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:de N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:s N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:t N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:te N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:s N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:s N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:t N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:s N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:si   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:de   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_KÖYSI





0:si   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:te N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:de N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:s N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:t N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:te N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:s N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:s N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:t N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:s N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:si   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:de   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_PONSI





0:si   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:te N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ne N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:s N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:t N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:te N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:s N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:s N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:t N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:s N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:si   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ne   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_LÄNSI





0:si   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:te N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ne N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:s N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:t N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:te N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:s N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:s N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:t N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:s N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:si   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ne   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_VARSI





0:si   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:te N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:re N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:s N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:t N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:te N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:s N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:s N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:t N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:s N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:si   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:re   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_VIRSI





0:si   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:te N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:re N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:s N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:t N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:te N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:s N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:s N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:t N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:s N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:si   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:re   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_JÄLSI





0:si   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:te N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:le N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:s N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:t N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:te N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:s N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:s N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:t N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:s N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:si   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:le   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;





LEXICON N_LAPSI




0:psi   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pse N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ps N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:s N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:pse N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:ps N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:ps N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:s N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:ps N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:psi   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:pse   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ps   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_UKSI



0:ksi   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:kse N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ks N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:s N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:kse N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:ks N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:ks N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:s N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:ks N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:ksi   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:kse   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ks   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_PEITSI


0:tsi   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tse N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:ts N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:s N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:tse N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:ts N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:ts N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:s N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:ts N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:tsi   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tse   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ts   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;
 
LEXICON N_VEITSI

0:tsi   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tse N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:ts N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:s N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:tse N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:ts N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:ts N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:s N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:ts N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:tsi   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tse   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ts   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;


 
LEXICON N_HAAKSI



0:ksi   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:hte N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:hde N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ks N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:h N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:hte N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:ks N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:ks N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:ks N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:ksi   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:hde   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ks   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;







LEXICON N_AHVEN




0   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0   N_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:e N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0   N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_JOUTSEN

0   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0   N_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:e N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0   N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_SIEMEN


0   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0   N_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:e N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_AJATAR


0:ar   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tare    N_BACK_SINGULARS ;
0:tar     N_BACK_PLURALS ;
0:ar      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:tare N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:ar      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:ar      N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ar      N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:ar      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:ar  N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:are N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ar  N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:ar  N_COMPOUND_TEN ;
